Washington statutes.
RCW 6.15.025

Exemption of pension or retirement plan benefits from execution for judgment for out-of-state income tax.

Where a judgment is in favor of any state for failure to pay that state's income tax on benefits received while a resident of the state of Washington from a pension or other retirement plan, all property in this state, real or personal, tangible or intangible, of a judgment debtor shall be exempt from execution, attachment, garnishment, or seizure by or under any legal process whatever, and when a debtor dies, or absconds, and leaves his or her spouse and dependents any property exempted by this section, the same shall be exempt to the surviving spouse and dependents.

[ 1991 c 123 s 3.]

NOTES:

Purpose—1991 c 123: See note following RCW 6.13.030.